District of Columbia statutes.
7-3011

Aftercare plan.

(a)

Prior to discharge from the rehabilitation plan, an aftercare plan shall be developed by the treatment provider in consultation with the client. The aftercare plan shall include periodic interviews by the treatment provider with the client within one month, three months, and six months after discharge and include procedures for collecting information about outcomes of care from the client.

(b)

APRA shall, at the end of each fiscal year, compile success rates for treatment providers and submit them to the Council by November 1 of each year.

July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-146, § 12, 47 DCR 4350

History